Maryland, session 2026, HB1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 541 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Land Use
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(19) § 4–217 (PATUXENT RESEARCH REFUGE);
[(19)] (20) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(20)] (21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (22) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (25) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(26)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
4–217.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 541
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISTRICT COUNCIL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE “CENTRAL NATURAL AREA” MEANS AN AREA WITHIN THE PATUXENT
RESEARCH REFUGE OR THE BELTSVILLE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH CENTER
THAT PROVIDES HABITAT FOR NATIVE FLORA AND FAUNA, INCLUDING FORESTS,
WOODLANDS, WETLANDS, MEADOWS, AND EARLY SUCCESSIONAL GRASSLANDS AND
SHRUBLANDS.
(3) “LOCAL ZONING AUTHORITY” MEANS:
(I) A LOCAL JURISDICTION FOR LAND LOCATED IN ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY, THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY COUNCIL OR OTHER BODY WITH
AUTHORITY TO DESIGNATE ZONING CLASSIFICATIONS; OR
(II) FOR PROPERTY LAND LOCATED IN THE
MARYLAND–WASHINGTON REGIONAL DISTRICT ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 20,
SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE, A DISTRICT COUNCIL, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(B) ANY FEDERALLY OWNED LAND THAT IS PART OF THE PROPERTY KNOWN
AS THE PATUXENT RESEARCH REFUGE SHALL BE DESIGNATED AND MAINTAINED IN
A ZONING CLASSIFICATION THAT RESTRICTS THE USES TO OPEN SPACE, RESERVED
OPEN SPACE, OR OTHER RESOURCE CONSERVATION USES.
(C) IF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR ANY ASSIGNEE SELLS, LEASES,
LICENSES, OR OTHERWISE ENCUMBERS ANY PORTION OF LAND THAT IS PART OF THE
PROPERTY KNOWN AS THE PATUXENT RESEARCH REFUGE, THE LOCAL ZONING
AUTHORITY SHALL CONTINUE A ZONING CLASSIFICATION FOR THAT PROPERTY
THAT:
(1) RESTRICTS THE USES TO OPEN SPACE, RESERVED OPEN SPACE,
OR OTHER RESOURCE CONSERVATION USES; AND
(2) DOES NOT PERMIT COMMERCIAL, INDUSTRIAL, OR RESIDENTIAL
USES.
(D) A CENTRAL NATURAL AREA IN THE PROPERTY KNOWN AS THE
PATUXENT RESEARCH REFUGE MAY NOT BE CONVERTED TO BE USED FOR
AGRICULTURE, ACTIVE RECREATION, FORESTRY, OR OTHER PLANT HARVESTING.
– 3 –

Ch. 541 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) PRIOR TO ANY DEVELOPMENT ON LAND IN THE PROPERTY KNOWN AS
THE PATUXENT RESEARCH REFUGE, THE LOCAL ZONING AUTHORITY SHALL:
(1) HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING; AND
(2) MAKE A FINAL DECISION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THAT THE PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT WILL
NOT HAVE A SUBSTANTIAL IMPACT ON ANY LAND IN A CENTRAL NATURAL AREA.
[25–211.
If the United States Department of Agriculture sells any portion of the property
known as the Beltsville Agricultural Research Center, the district council shall place and
permanently maintain the land in a zoning classification of agricultural open space
immediately after the transfer of the land to the buyer.]
25–211.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE THE DISTRICT
COUNCIL SHALL DESIGNATE AND MAINTAIN THE FEDERALLY OWNED PROPERTY
KNOWN AS THE BELTSVILLE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH CENTER OR ANY OTHER
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE PROPERTY IN BELTSVILLE OR ITS VICINITY
TO A ZONING CLASSIFICATION THAT RESTRICTS THE USES TO OPEN SPACE OR
RESERVED OPEN SPACE.
(B) IF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR ANY ASSIGNEE SELLS, LEASES,
LICENSES, OR OTHERWISE ENCUMBERS ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY KNOWN AS
THE BELTSVILLE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH CENTER OR ANY OTHER U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE PROPERTY IN BELTSVILLE OR ITS VICINITY, THE
DISTRICT COUNCIL SHALL CONTINUE A ZONING CLASSIFICATION FOR THAT
PROPERTY THAT:
(1) RESTRICTS THE USES TO OPEN SPACE OR RESERVED OPEN SPACE;
AND
(2) DOES NOT PERMIT COMMERCIAL, INDUSTRIAL, OR RESIDENTIAL
USES.
(C) THE DISTRICT COUNCIL MAY NOT APPROVE ANY OVERLAYS, SPECIAL
EXCEPTIONS, OR MODIFICATIONS TO THE ZONING CLASSIFICATIONS REQUIRED BY
THIS SECTION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 541
(C) A CENTRAL NATURAL AREA, AS DEFINED IN § 4–217 OF THIS ARTICLE,
IN THE PROPERTY KNOWN AS THE BELTSVILLE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH CENTER
MAY NOT BE CONVERTED TO BE USED FOR AGRICULTURE, ACTIVE RECREATION,
FORESTRY, OR OTHER PLANT HARVESTING.
(D) PRIOR TO ANY DEVELOPMENT ON LAND IN THE PROPERTY KNOWN AS
THE BELTSVILLE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH CENTER, THE DISTRICT COUNCIL
SHALL:
(1) HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING; AND
(2) MAKE A FINAL DECISION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THAT THE PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT WILL
NOT HAVE A SUBSTANTIAL IMPACT ON ANY LAND IN A CENTRAL NATURAL AREA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –